Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2002
Legislative findings.

Each year Nebraska children are reported missing. The Legislature is seeking a procedure whereby it can help locate such missing children through school records and birth certificates filed with the schools and the Department of Health and Human Services.

Laws 1987, LB 599, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 82;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 136.